Massachusetts, session 194th, H2320.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 1B of chapter 41 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law, bylaw, rule or regulation to the contrary, there shall be in the Town of
Berkley the appointed office of treasurer-collector, which office shall have all the powers, duties
and responsibilities of and be subject to the liabilities and penalties conferred and imposed by
law on the offices of treasurer and collector under the General Laws.
SECTION 2. The treasurer-collector shall be appointed and may be removed, after
opportunity for a hearing, by the board of selectmen. The board of selectmen may establish an
employment contract for a period of up to three (3) years, subject to annual appropriations, with
the treasurer-collector for salary, fringe benefits and other conditions of employment, including,
but not limited to, severance pay, reimbursement for expenses incurred in the performance of the
duties of office, liability insurance and conditions of discipline, termination, dismissal,
reappointment, performance standards and leave.
of 2

SECTION 3. Upon the effective date of this act, the positions of elected treasurer and
collector shall be abolished and the term of the incumbents of such offices terminated.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the elected incumbents holding and performing the duties of the
offices of treasurer and collector may continue to serve, either until the expirations of the terms
for which they were elected, unless they sooner vacate such offices, or until a new treasurer-
collector is appointed by the board of selectmen in accordance with section 1 of this act,
whichever first occurs.
SECTION 4. No contracts or liabilities in force on the effective date of this act shall be
affected by the abolition of the elected offices of treasurer and collector and consolidation of
certain financial functions of the town as provided in this act, and the appointed office created in
this act, shall, in all respects, be the lawful successor of the elected offices so abolished. All
records, property and equipment of the offices of the elected treasurer and collector shall be
assigned to the office of the appointed treasurer-collector.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2